Illinois, session 104th, HB2060.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Congressional Redistricting Act of 52011 is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 77/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Congressional Redistricting Act of 2011.9(Source: P.A. 97-14, eff. 6-24-11.)